District of Columbia statutes.
29-809.11

Subchapter not exclusive.

This subchapter shall not preclude a limited liability company from being merged under law other than this chapter.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1015 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).

Editor's Notes